Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201521-403
Terms, defined.

The following words and phrases when used in the Nebraska Benefit Corporation Act have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1) Benefit corporation means a business corporation:

(a) Which has elected to become subject to the act; and

(b) The status of which as a benefit corporation has not been terminated;

(2) Benefit director means the director designated as the benefit director of a benefit corporation under section 21-409;

(3) Benefit enforcement proceeding means any claim or action or proceeding for:

(a) Failure of a benefit corporation to pursue or create general public benefit or a specific public benefit purpose set forth in its articles of incorporation; or

(b) Violation of any obligation, duty, or standard of conduct under the act;

(4) Benefit officer means the officer designated as the benefit officer of a benefit corporation under section 21-411;

(5) Business corporation means a domestic corporation as defined in section 21-214;

(6) General public benefit means a material positive impact on society and the environment, taken as a whole, assessed against a third-party standard, from the business and operations of a benefit corporation;

(7) Independent means having no material relationship with a benefit corporation or a subsidiary of the benefit corporation. Serving as benefit director or benefit officer does not make an individual not independent. A material relationship between an individual and a benefit corporation or any of its subsidiaries will be conclusively presumed to exist if:

(a) The individual is, or has been within the last three years, an employee other than a benefit officer of the benefit corporation or a subsidiary;

(b) An immediate family member of the individual is, or has been within the last three years, an executive officer other than a benefit officer of the benefit corporation or a subsidiary; or

(c) There is beneficial or record ownership of five percent or more of the outstanding shares of the benefit corporation, calculated as if all outstanding rights to acquire equity interests in the benefit corporation had been exercised, by:

(i) The individual; or

(ii) An entity:

(A) Of which the individual is a director, an officer, or a manager; or

(B) In which the individual owns beneficially or of record five percent or more of the outstanding equity interests, calculated as if all outstanding rights to acquire equity interests in the entity had been exercised;

(8) Minimum status vote means:

(a) In the case of a business corporation, in addition to any other required approval or vote, the satisfaction of the following conditions:

(i) The shareholders of every class or series are entitled to vote separately on a corporate action regardless of a limitation stated in the articles of incorporation or bylaws on the voting rights of any class or series; and

(ii) The corporate action must be approved by a vote of the shareholders of each class or series entitled to cast at least two-thirds of the votes that all shareholders of the class or series are entitled to cast on the action; and

(b) In the case of a domestic entity other than a business corporation, in addition to any other required approval, vote, or consent, the satisfaction of the following conditions:

(i) The holders of every class or series of equity interests in the entity that are entitled to receive a distribution of any kind from the entity are entitled to vote separately on or consent to the action regardless of any otherwise applicable limitation on the voting or consent rights of any class or series; and

(ii) The action must be approved by a vote or consent of the holders described in subdivision (i) of this subdivision entitled to cast at least two-thirds of the votes or consents that all of those holders are entitled to cast on the action;

(9) Publicly traded corporation means a business corporation that has shares listed on a national securities exchange or traded in a market maintained by one or more members of a national securities association;

(10) Specific public benefit includes:

(a) Providing low-income or underserved individuals or communities with beneficial products or services;

(b) Promoting economic opportunity for individuals or communities beyond the creation of jobs in the normal course of business;

(c) Protecting or restoring the environment;

(d) Improving human health;

(e) Promoting the arts, sciences, or advancement of knowledge;

(f) Increasing the flow of capital to entities with a purpose to benefit society or the environment; and

(g) Conferring any other particular benefit on society or the environment;

(11) Subsidiary means in relation to a person, an entity in which the person owns beneficially or of record fifty percent or more of the outstanding equity interests; and

(12) Third-party standard means a recognized standard for defining, reporting, and assessing corporate social and environmental performance that is:

(a) Comprehensive because it assesses the effect of the business and its operations upon the interests listed in subdivisions (1)(a)(ii), (iii), (iv), and (v) of section 21-408;

(b) Developed by an entity that is not controlled by the benefit corporation;

(c) Credible because it is developed by an entity that both:

(i) Has access to necessary expertise to assess overall corporate social and environmental performance; and

(ii) Uses a balanced multistakeholder approach to develop the standard, including a reasonable public comment period; and

(d) Transparent because the following information is publicly available:

(i) About the standard:

(A) The criteria considered when measuring the overall social and environmental performance of a business; and

(B) The relative weightings, if any, of those criteria; and

(ii) About the development and revision of the standard:

(A) The identity of the directors, officers, material owners, and governing body of the entity that developed and controls revisions to the standard;

(B) The process by which revisions to the standard and changes to the membership of the governing body are made; and

(C) An accounting of the revenue and sources of financial support for the entity, with sufficient detail to disclose any relationships that could reasonably be considered to present a potential conflict of interest.

Laws 2014, LB751, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB35, § 2.
January 1, 2017